Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201281-1114.01
Capital construction project;
plan required; contents; revisions required; when; to whom submitted.

Each department and agency of the state prior to submitting a capital
construction project request in excess of four hundred thousand dollars shall
cause to be prepared a comprehensive capital facilities plan. Such plan shall
include, but not be limited to, a projection of future programmatic needs,
analysis of existing facilities and the utilization of such facilities, and
identification of projects to meet those projected programmatic needs, including
addition to, or renovation or replacement of, existing space, parking, streets,
and utilities. The comprehensive capital facilities plan shall be updated
or revised when a major capital construction project requested for funding
is not in compliance with such plan or when revisions in projected programmatic
needs would significantly affect the comprehensive capital facilities plan.
Such plans and any updates or revisions shall be submitted to the state building
division and the Legislative Fiscal Analyst. The plans and any updates or revisions submitted to the
Legislative Fiscal Analyst shall be submitted electronically. Such
plans and revisions or updates shall be prepared in accordance with rules
and regulations adopted and promulgated by the state building division. The
Department of Administrative Services shall adjust the dollar amount in this
section every four years beginning January 1, 2002, to account for inflationary
and market changes. The adjustment shall be based on percentage changes in
a construction cost index and any other published index relevant to operations
and utilities costs, as selected by the department.

Laws 1981, LB 381, § 26;

Laws 1998, LB 1129, § 23;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 186.
July 19, 2012